North Dakota, session 69, SB2331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-60 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Theodore Roosevelt national park working group - Executive committee - Duties -
Report.
1. The Theodore Roosevelt national park working group must be chaired by a member of
the legislative assembly and consists of:
a. One member of the senate and one member of the house of representatives,
representing different political parties, appointed by the chairman of legislative
management;
b. One representative of the parks and recreation department, appointed by the
governor;
c. One representative from an entity that represents commerce or tourism in the
Medora community;
d. One representative of the division of tourism, appointed by the governor;
e. The agriculture commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
f. One representative from the North Dakota university system with an academic or
research background in equine studies, appointed by the governor;
Page No. 1 25.0598.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
g. One representative of any nonprofit group located in the state which is
established to protect the horses in the Theodore Roosevelt national park,
appointed by the governor;
h. One representative of the national park service, appointed by the national park
service; and
i. One representative of the Indian affairs commission, appointed by the governor.
2. The working group shall:
a. In cooperation with the national park service and the United States government,
provide recommendations for managing the population of wild horses in the
Theodore Roosevelt national park to remain above two hundred horses;
b. Identify and offer opportunities to support and maintain the wild horses within the
Theodore Roosevelt national park;
c. Promote the wild horses to benefit tourism and to make recommendations to the
department;
d. Assist the department in carrying out activities to educate the public;
e. Meet quarterly; and
f. Provide, by July first of each year, a report to the legislative management which
includes the working group's detailed plan to implement the requirements of this
section.
3. The working group may make recommendations for management activities, including
birth control, removals, and permanent placement of horses after removal. All
management activities must be humane and nonlethal , unless the health or safety of a
horse is compromised.
4. The working group may enter an agreement with the national park service to
implement this section.
5. Upon recommendation from the working group, the state may enter an agreement with
a private entity to address any issues related to the wild horses in the Theodore
Roosevelt national park.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE - THEODORE
ROOSEVELT NATIONAL PARK WORKING GROUP. There is appropriated out of any moneys
in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $49,500, or so
Page No. 2 25.0598.04000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of commerce for the purpose of
administering the Theodore Roosevelt national park working group, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 3 25.0598.04000